Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1186XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1186XD (12) 91
nls/ko

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
DIVISION I
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROGRAMS —— TAX CREDIT LIMITS
Section 1. Section 15.119, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
15.119 Aggregate tax credit limit for certain economic
business development programs.
1. a. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in any
of the business development programs listed in subsection 2,
the authority, except as provided in paragraph “b”, shall not
authorize for any one fiscal year an amount of tax credits for
the programs specified in subsection 2 that is in excess of one
hundred seventy ten million dollars.
b. (1) The authority may authorize an amount of tax credits
during a fiscal year that is in excess of the amount specified
in paragraph “a”, but the amount of such excess shall not exceed
twenty percent of the amount specified in paragraph “a”, and
shall be counted against the total amount of tax credits that
may be authorized for the next fiscal year.
(2) Any amount of tax credits authorized and awarded during
a fiscal year for a program specified in subsection 2 which are
irrevocably declined by the awarded business on or before June
30 of the next fiscal year may be reallocated, authorized, and
awarded during the fiscal year in which the declination occurs.
Tax credits authorized pursuant to this subparagraph shall not
be considered for purposes of subparagraph (1).
2. The authority, with the approval of the board, shall
adopt by rule a procedure for allocating the aggregate tax
credit limit established in this section among the following
The aggregate tax credit limit specified in subsection 1 shall
be allocated to business development programs as follows:
a. (1) The high quality jobs program administered pursuant
to subchapter II, part 13.
(2) In allocating tax credits pursuant to this subsection
for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2022, and for each fiscal
year thereafter, the authority shall not allocate more than
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-1- nls/ko 1/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
sixty-eight million dollars for purposes of this paragraph.
(3) In allocating tax credits pursuant to this subsection,
the authority shall prioritize issuing additional research
activities tax credits pursuant to section 15.335.
b. The enterprise zones program administered pursuant to
sections 15E.191 through 15E.197, Code 2014.
c. The assistive device tax credit program administered
pursuant to section 422.33, subsection 9.
d. The tax credits for investments in qualifying businesses
issued pursuant to section 15E.43. In allocating tax credits
pursuant to this subsection, the authority shall allocate two
million dollars for purposes of this paragraph, unless the
authority determines that the tax credits awarded will be less
than that amount.
e. a. The tax credits for investments in an innovation fund
pursuant to section 15E.52 chapter 15E, subchapter VI, and the
seed investor tax credit pursuant to chapter 15E, subchapter
IV. In allocating tax credits pursuant to this subsection, the
authority shall allocate eight ten million dollars for purposes
of this paragraph, unless the authority determines that the tax
credits awarded will be less than that amount and the board
shall determine the tax credit amount allocated to each program
under this paragraph each fiscal year.
f. The redevelopment tax credit program for brownfields
and grayfields administered pursuant to sections 15.293A and
15.293B.
g. The workforce housing tax incentives program administered
pursuant to subchapter II, part 17. In allocating tax credits
pursuant to this subsection, the authority shall not allocate
more than thirty-five million dollars for purposes of this
paragraph. Of the moneys allocated under this paragraph,
seventeen million five hundred thousand dollars shall be
reserved for allocation to qualified housing projects in small
cities, as defined in section 15.352, that are registered on
or after July 1, 2017.
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-2- nls/ko 2/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
h. The renewable chemical production tax credit program
administered pursuant to subchapter II, part 12. In allocating
tax credits pursuant to this subsection for the fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2021, and for each fiscal year beginning
before July 1, 2037, the authority shall not allocate more than
five million dollars for purposes of this paragraph. This
paragraph is repealed July 1, 2039.
3. In allocating the amount of tax credits authorized
pursuant to subsection 1 among the programs specified in
subsection 2, the authority shall not allocate more than
fifteen million dollars for purposes of subsection 2, paragraph
“f”.
b. The renewable chemical production tax credit pursuant
to subchapter II, part 12, and the sustainable aviation fuel
production tax credit program pursuant to subchapter II, part
36. In allocating tax credits pursuant to this subsection, the
authority shall allocate ten million dollars for purposes of
this paragraph, and the board shall determine the tax credit
amount allocated to each program specified in this paragraph
for each fiscal year.
c. The research and development tax credit program pursuant
to subchapter II, part 35. In allocating tax credits pursuant
to this subsection, the authority shall allocate forty million
dollars for purposes of this paragraph.
d. The business incentives for growth program administered
pursuant to subchapter II, part 33. In allocating tax credits
pursuant to this subsection for the calendar year beginning
January 1, 2026, and for each fiscal year thereafter, the
authority shall not allocate more than fifty million dollars
for purposes of this paragraph.
4. 3. The authority shall submit to the department of
revenue on or before August 15 of each year a report on the tax
credits allocated pursuant to this section and the tax credits
awarded under each of the programs described in subsection 2.
DIVISION II
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-3- nls/ko 3/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROGRAMS —— TAX CREDIT LIMITS
CONFORMING CHANGES
Sec. 2. Section 15.293A, subsection 6, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
6. The amount of tax credits that may be awarded by the
board shall be subject to the limitation in section 15.119
Except as provided in section 15.293B, subsection 6, the board
shall not award in any one fiscal year an amount of tax credits
that exceeds fifteen million dollars.
Sec. 3. Section 15.293B, subsection 6, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
6. a. (1) Tax credits revoked under subsection 3 including
tax credits revoked up to five years prior to July 1, 2021, and
tax credits not awarded under subsection 4 or 5, may be awarded
in the next annual application period established in subsection
1, paragraph “c”.
(2) Any amount of tax credits authorized and awarded during
a fiscal year which are irrevocably declined by the awarded
investor on or before June 30 of the immediately succeeding
fiscal year may be awarded in the next annual application
period established in subsection 1, paragraph “c”.
b. Tax credits awarded pursuant to paragraph “a” shall not
be counted against the limit under section 15.119, subsection 3
15.293A, subsection 6.
Sec. 4. Section 15.318, subsection 3, paragraph e, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
e. In each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2023
2025, and ending on or before June 30, 2036, the authority
may award an amount of tax credits under the program not to
exceed the maximum aggregate amount allocated in determined by
the board pursuant to section 15.119, subsection 2, paragraph
“h”“b”.
Sec. 5. Section 15.354, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended
by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the
following:
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-4- nls/ko 4/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
4. Maximum tax incentives amount.
a. (1) In the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and
ending June 30, 2026, the authority shall not award an amount
of tax credits in excess of forty-three million dollars.
(2) In the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending
June 30, 2027, the authority shall not award an amount of tax
credits in excess of forty million dollars.
(3) In the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, and for each
fiscal year thereafter, the authority shall not award an amount
of tax credits in excess of thirty-five million dollars.
b. Of the tax credits allocated under paragraph “a”, fifty
percent of the allocation available in each fiscal year shall
be reserved for allocation to qualified housing projects in
small cities.
c. Notwithstanding paragraph “b”, if the sum of the amount
of tax incentives awarded in a given fiscal year for housing
projects located in small cities based on the authority’s
review and scoring of applications does not exceed the amount
reserved for housing projects located in small cities pursuant
to paragraph “b”, the authority may award the remaining amount
of tax incentives reserved for housing projects located in
small cities to other housing projects during that same fiscal
year.
d. Tax credits revoked by the authority or irrevocably
declined by a housing business before June 30 of the fiscal
year following the award may be awarded during the fiscal year
the revocation or declination occurs.
e. The maximum aggregate amount of tax incentives that
may be awarded and issued under section 15.355 to a housing
business for a housing project shall not exceed one million
dollars.
f. If a housing business qualifies for a higher amount
of tax incentives under section 15.355 than is allowed by
the limitation imposed in paragraph “e”, the authority and
the housing business may negotiate an apportionment of the
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-5- nls/ko 5/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
reduction in tax incentives between the sales tax refund
provided in section 15.355, subsection 2, and the workforce
housing investment tax credits provided in section 15.355,
subsection 3, provided the total aggregate amount of tax
incentives after the apportioned reduction does not exceed the
amount in paragraph “e”.
g. The authority shall issue tax incentives under the
program on a first-come, first-served basis until the maximum
amount of tax incentives allowed under paragraph “a” is reached.
Sec. 6. Section 15.354, subsection 6, paragraph d, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
d. The authority shall administer tax credit allocations
for disaster recovery housing projects separately from the
general allocation and separately from the allocation reserved
for small cities in section 15.119, subsection 2, paragraph
“g”. The authority shall issue tax incentives under the
program for disaster recovery housing projects on a first-come,
first-served basis until the maximum amount of tax incentives
allocated under section 15.119, subsection 5, is reached. The
authority shall maintain a list of disaster recovery housing
projects awarded tax incentives under the program, so that if
the maximum aggregate amount of tax incentives allocated for
disaster recovery housing projects under the program is reached
in a given fiscal year, such disaster recovery housing projects
that were completed but for which tax incentives were not
issued shall be placed on a wait list in the order the disaster
recovery housing projects were awarded tax incentives pursuant
to paragraph “c”, and shall be given priority for receiving
tax incentives in succeeding fiscal years maximum tax credit
amounts specified in section 15.354, subsection 4, paragraphs
“a” and “b”.
DIVISION III
BUSINESS INCENTIVES FOR GROWTH PROGRAM
Sec. 7. NEW SECTION. 15.111 Assistance for certain programs
and projects.
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-6- nls/ko 6/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
1. a. Under the authority provided in section 15.106A,
there shall be established one or more funds within the state
treasury, under the control of the authority, to be used for
purposes of this section.
b. A fund established for purposes of this section shall
consist of any moneys appropriated to the authority for
purposes of this section, or moneys otherwise accruing to
the authority and deposited in the fund for purposes of this
section.
c. Interest or earnings on moneys in a fund used for the
purposes of this section, and all repayments or recaptures of
the assistance provided under this section, shall accrue to
the authority and shall be used for purposes of this section,
notwithstanding section 12C.7. Moneys in a fund are not
subject to section 8.33.
2. a. The moneys in a fund established for purposes of
this section, as described in subsection 1, shall be allocated
by the authority in appropriate amounts to be used for the
following purposes:
(1) For program support.
(2) For deposit in the innovation and commercialization
development fund created pursuant to section 15.412.
(3) For providing financial assistance to businesses
engaged in disaster recovery. For purposes of this
subparagraph, “business engaged in disaster recovery” means
a business located in an area declared a disaster area by a
federal official, that has sustained physical damage, has
closed as a result of a natural disaster, and has a plan for
reopening that includes employing a substantial number of the
employees the business employed before the natural disaster
occurred.
(4) For deposit in the entrepreneur investment awards
program fund pursuant to section 15E.363.
(5) For deposit in a fund created for purposes of the
strategic infrastructure program established pursuant to
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-7- nls/ko 7/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
section 15.313.
(6) For deposit in the nuisance property remediation fund
established pursuant to section 15.338.
(7) For deposit in the community catalyst building
remediation fund established pursuant to section 15.231.
(8) For providing financial assistance to eligible
businesses for the business incentives for growth program
pursuant to section 15.504.
b. Each fiscal year, the authority shall estimate the
amount of revenues available for purposes of this section and
shall develop a budget appropriate for the expenditure of the
revenues available.
Sec. 8. NEW SECTION. 15.502 Short title.
This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Business
Incentives for Growth Program” or “BIG Program”.
Sec. 9. NEW SECTION. 15.503 Definitions.
As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. “Base employment level” means the number of full-time
equivalent positions at a business, as established by the
authority and the business using the business’s payroll
records, as of the date the business applies for tax incentives
under the program.
2. “Benefits” means nonwage compensation provided to an
employee. “Benefits” include medical and dental insurance, a
pension, a retirement plan, a profit-sharing plan, child care,
life insurance, vision insurance, and disability insurance.
3. “Community” means a city, county, or entity established
pursuant to chapter 28E.
4. “Contract completion” means the date of completion of
the terms of a contract between a contractor and an eligible
business.
5. “Contractor” means a person that has executed a contract
with an eligible business for the provision of property,
materials, or services for the construction or equipping of a
facility that is part of the eligible business’s project.
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-8- nls/ko 8/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
6. “Created jobs” or “create jobs” means new, permanent,
full-time equivalent positions added to an eligible business’s
payroll, at the location of the eligible business’s project, in
excess of the eligible business’s base employment level.
7. “Data center business” means the same as defined in
section 423.3, subsection 95.
8. “Eligible business” means a business that meets the
requirements of section 15.504.
9. “Full-time equivalent position” means a non-part-time
position for the number of hours or days per week considered
to be full-time work for the kind of service or work performed
for an employer. Typically, a full-time equivalent position
requires two thousand eighty hours of work in a calendar year,
including all paid holidays, vacations, sick time, and other
paid leave.
10. “Program” means the business incentives for growth
program.
11. “Project” means an activity or set of activities
directly related to the start-up or location of an eligible
business, proposed in an eligible business’s application to the
program, that will accomplish the goals of the program.
12. “Project completion date” means the date by which an
eligible business that has been approved by the authority to
participate in the program agrees to complete the terms and
conditions of the agreement under section 15.506.
13. “Project completion period” means the period of time
between the date the authority approves an eligible business to
participate in the program and the project completion date.
14. “Qualifying investment” means a capital investment in
real property, including the purchase price of the land, site
preparation, infrastructure, and building construction for
use in the operation of an eligible business. “Qualifying
investment” also means a capital investment in depreciable
assets for use in the operation of an eligible business.
15. “Qualifying wage threshold” means the mean wage level
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-9- nls/ko 9/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
represented by the wages within two standard deviations of
the mean wage within the laborshed area in which the eligible
business is located, as calculated by the authority by rule,
using the most current covered wage and employment data
available from the department of workforce development for the
laborshed area in which the eligible business is located.
16. “Subcontractor” means a person that contracts with
a contractor for the provision of property, materials, or
services for the construction or equipping of a facility that
is part of an eligible business’s project.
17. “Tax incentives” means tax credits, tax refunds, or tax
exemptions authorized under the program by the authority for an
eligible business.
Sec. 10. NEW SECTION. 15.504 Eligible business.
1. To be eligible to receive tax incentives under
the program, a business must meet all of the following
requirements:
a. The community in which the proposed project is located
must approve the project either by ordinance or resolution.
b. (1) The business must be primarily engaged in advanced
manufacturing, bioscience, insurance and finance, or technology
and innovation. The business shall not be a data center
business, a retail business, or a business where a cover charge
or membership requirement restricts certain individuals from
entering the business.
(2) Factors the authority shall consider to determine if
a business is primarily engaged in advanced manufacturing,
biosciences, insurance and finance, or technology and
innovation shall include but are not limited to all of the
following:
(a) The business’s North American industry classification
system code.
(b) The business’s main sources of revenue.
(c) The business’s customer base.
c. (1) The business must not be solely relocating
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-10- nls/ko 10/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
operations from one area of the state to another area of
the state. A proposed project that does not create jobs or
involve a substantial amount of new capital investment shall
be presumed to be a relocation of operations. For purposes of
this subparagraph, the authority shall consider a letter from
the affected local community’s government officials supporting
the business’s move away from the affected local community
in making a determination whether the business is solely
relocating operations.
(2) This paragraph shall not be construed to prohibit
a business from expanding the business’s operations in a
community if the business has similar operations in this state
that are not closing or undergoing a substantial reduction in
operations.
d. The business must provide comprehensive benefits to
each full-time equivalent employee employed at the project.
The authority may adopt rules under chapter 17A to determine
the procedure for establishing requirements for comprehensive
benefits.
e. (1) The business must not have a record of violations of
the law or of rules, including but not limited to antitrust,
environmental, trade, or worker safety, that over a period of
time show a consistent pattern or that establish the business’s
intentional, criminal, or reckless conduct in violation of such
laws or rules.
(2) If the authority determines that the business has a
record of violations described in subparagraph (1), and the
authority finds that the violations did not seriously affect
public health, public safety, or the environment, the business
may be eligible to qualify for the program.
(3) If the authority determines that the business has
a record of violations described in subparagraph (1), and
the authority finds that there were mitigating circumstances
related to the violations, the business may be eligible to
qualify for the program.
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-11- nls/ko 11/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
(4) In making determinations and findings under
subparagraphs (2) and (3), and making a determination whether a
business is disqualified from the program, the authority shall
be exempt from chapter 17A.
2. In determining if a business is eligible to participate
in the program, the authority shall consider a variety of
factors, including but not limited to all of the following:
a. The impact of the business’s proposed project on
businesses that are in competition with the business.
The authority shall make a good-faith effort to identify
existing Iowa businesses in competition with the business
being considered for the program. The authority shall make
a good-faith effort to determine the probability that any
proposed tax incentives will displace employees of the
competing businesses.
b. The business’s proposed project’s economic impact on
the state. The authority shall place greater emphasis on
businesses and proposed projects that meet the following
requirements:
(1) The business has a high proportion of in-state
suppliers.
(2) The proposed project will diversify the state economy.
(3) The business has few in-state competitors.
(4) The proposed project has the potential to create jobs on
an ongoing basis.
(5) The proposed project has the potential to increase
productivity, efficiency, and competitiveness through adoption
and integration of smart technologies including specialized
hardware, software, or other equipment.
(6) The proposed project has the potential to increase the
state’s overall gross domestic product.
(7) Any other factors the authority deems relevant in
determining the economic impact of a proposed project.
Sec. 11. NEW SECTION. 15.505 Applications —— authorization
of tax credits and exemptions.
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-12- nls/ko 12/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
1. a. Applications for the program shall be submitted
to the authority in the form and manner prescribed by the
authority by rule. Each application must be accompanied by an
application fee in an amount determined by the authority by
rule.
b. For a proposed project that will result in elevated
water consumption by the business, the application shall be
accompanied by a water conservation and waste reduction plan,
and shall be submitted to the authority in the form and manner
prescribed by the authority by rule.
2. In determining the eligibility of a business to
participate in the program, the authority may engage outside
experts to complete a technical, financial, or other review of
an application submitted by a business.
3. a. The authority and the board may negotiate with an
eligible business regarding the terms of, and the aggregate
value of, the tax incentives the eligible business may receive
under the program. The maximum aggregate value of the tax
incentives that any one eligible business may receive shall
not exceed five percent of the eligible business’s qualifying
investment.
b. The board may authorize any combination of tax incentives
available under the program for an eligible business.
4. The board shall not authorize an award under this part
before January 1, 2026.
Sec. 12. NEW SECTION. 15.506 Agreement.
1. An eligible business that is approved by the authority to
participate in the program shall enter into an agreement with
the authority that specifies the criteria for the successful
completion of all requirements of the program. The agreement
must contain, at a minimum, provisions related to all of the
following:
a. The eligible business must certify to the authority
annually that the business is in compliance with the agreement.
b. If the eligible business fails to comply with any
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-13- nls/ko 13/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
requirements of the program or the agreement, as determined
by the authority, the eligible business may be required to
repay any tax incentives the authority issued to the eligible
business. The authority will notify the department of revenue
of any required repayment of a tax incentive, which shall be
considered a tax payment due and payable to the department of
revenue by any taxpayer that claimed the tax incentive, and the
failure to make the repayment may be treated by the department
of revenue in the same manner as a failure to pay the tax shown
due, or required to be shown due, with the filing of a return
or deposit form. A county shall have the authority to take
action to recover the value of property taxes not collected as
a result of the exemption provided to the business under this
part.
c. If the eligible business undergoes a layoff or
permanently closes any of its facilities within the state, the
eligible business may be subject to all of the following:
(1) A reduction or elimination of some or all of the tax
incentives the authority issued to the eligible business.
(2) Repayment of any tax incentives that the business
has claimed, and payment of any penalties assessed by the
department of revenue.
d. The project completion date, the number of created
jobs, the qualifying wage threshold that is applicable to the
project, the amount of qualifying investment, the maximum
aggregate value of the tax incentives authorized by the
board, and any other terms and obligations the authority deems
necessary.
e. The eligible business shall only employ individuals
legally authorized to work in this state. If the eligible
business is found to knowingly employ individuals who are
not legally authorized to work in this state, in addition
to any penalties provided by law, all or a portion of any
tax incentives issued by the authority shall be subject
to repayment as described in section 15.506, subsection 1,
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-14- nls/ko 14/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
paragraph “b”.
f. Any terms deemed necessary by the authority to effect the
eligible business’s ongoing compliance with section 15.504.
2. The business shall satisfy all applicable terms of
the agreement by the project completion date; however, the
board may for good cause extend the project completion date or
otherwise amend the terms of the agreement. The board shall
not amend the terms of the agreement to allow an increase in
the maximum aggregate value of the tax incentives authorized by
the board under section 15.505, subsection 3.
3. The eligible business shall comply with all applicable
terms of the agreement during the term of the agreement.
4. The eligible business shall not assign the agreement
to another entity without the advance written approval of the
board.
5. The authority may enforce the terms of the agreement as
necessary and appropriate.
Sec. 13. NEW SECTION. 15.507 Sales and use tax refund.
1. An eligible business that has been issued a tax incentive
certificate under the program shall be entitled to a refund,
as negotiated under section 15.505, subsection 3, of the sales
and use taxes paid under chapter 423 for gas, electricity,
water, and sewer utility services, tangible personal property,
or on services rendered, furnished, or performed to or for
a contractor or subcontractor and used in the fulfillment
of a written contract for the construction or equipping of
a facility that is part of the eligible business’s project.
Taxes attributable to intangible property and furniture and
furnishings shall not be refunded.
2. To receive the sales and use tax refund, the eligible
business shall file a claim with the department of revenue as
follows:
a. The contractor or subcontractor shall state under oath,
on forms provided by the department of revenue, the amount of
the sales of tangible personal property or services rendered,
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-15- nls/ko 15/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
furnished, or performed including water, sewer, gas, and
electric utility services upon which sales or use tax has been
paid prior to contract completion, and shall submit the forms
to the eligible business before contract completion.
b. The eligible business shall inform the department of
revenue in writing of contract completion. The eligible
business shall, after contract completion, submit an
application to the department of revenue for a refund of the
amount of the sales and use taxes paid pursuant to chapter 423
upon any tangible personal property, or services rendered,
furnished, or performed, including water, sewer, gas, and
electric utility services. The application shall be submitted
in the form and manner prescribed by the department of revenue.
The department of revenue shall audit the application and,
if approved, issue a warrant or warrants to the eligible
business in the amount of the sales or use tax which has been
paid to the state of Iowa under subsection 1. The eligible
business’s application must be submitted to the department of
revenue within one year after the project completion date. An
application filed by the eligible business in accordance with
this section shall not be denied by reason of a limitation set
forth in chapter 421 or 423.
c. The refund shall be remitted by the department of revenue
to the eligible business on a quarterly basis. Interest shall
not accrue on any part of the refund that has not yet been
remitted by the department of revenue to the eligible business.
3. A contractor or subcontractor that willfully makes a
false report of tax paid under this section is guilty of an
aggravated misdemeanor, and shall be liable for payment of the
tax and any applicable penalty and interest.
Sec. 14. NEW SECTION. 15.508 Qualifying investment tax
credit.
1. The authority may authorize a tax credit for an eligible
business pursuant to section 15.505, subsection 3. The
authority shall not issue a tax credit certificate to the
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-16- nls/ko 16/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
eligible business until the eligible business’s project or
a portion of the project has been placed in service. The
department of revenue shall remit the tax credit to the
eligible business equally over five tax years. The tax
credit shall be allowed against taxes imposed under chapter
422, subchapter II, III, or V, and against the moneys and
credits tax imposed in section 533.329. If the eligible
business is a partnership, S corporation, limited liability
company, cooperative organized under chapter 501 and filing
as a partnership for federal tax purposes, or estate or trust
electing to have the income taxed directly to the individual,
an individual may claim the tax credit allowed. The amount
claimed by the individual shall be based upon the pro rata
share of the individual’s earnings of the partnership, S
corporation, limited liability company, cooperative organized
under chapter 501 and filing as a partnership for federal tax
purposes, or estate or trust. Any tax credit in excess of
the eligible business’s tax liability for the tax year may be
refunded. A tax credit shall not be carried back to a tax year
prior to the tax year in which the tax credit is first claimed
by the eligible business.
2. If within five years of the date the authority issues
an eligible business a tax credit under subsection 1 the
eligible business sells, disposes of, razes, or otherwise
renders unusable all or a part of the land, buildings, or
other structures for which the tax credit was claimed under
this section, the tax liability of the eligible business for
the year in which all or part of the land, buildings, or other
existing structures are sold, disposed of, razed, or otherwise
rendered unusable shall be increased by one of the following
amounts:
a. One hundred percent of the tax credit claimed under
this section if all or a part of the land, buildings, or other
structures for which the tax credit was claimed under this
section cease to be eligible for the tax credit within one
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-17- nls/ko 17/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
year after the date the authority issued the tax credit to the
eligible business.
b. Eighty percent of the tax credit claimed under this
section if all or a part of the land, buildings, or other
structures for which the tax credit was claimed under this
section cease to be eligible for the tax credit within two
years after the date the authority issued the tax credit to the
eligible business.
c. Sixty percent of the tax credit claimed under this
section if all or a part of the land, buildings, or other
structures for which the tax credit was claimed under this
section cease to be eligible for the tax credit within three
years after the date the authority issued the tax credit to the
eligible business.
d. Forty percent of the tax credit claimed under this
section if all or a part of the land, buildings, or other
structures for which the tax credit was claimed under this
section cease to be eligible for the tax credit within four
years after the date the authority issued the tax credit to the
eligible business.
e. Twenty percent of the tax credit claimed under this
section if all or a part of the land, buildings, or other
structures for which the tax credit was claimed under this
section cease to be eligible for the tax credit within five
years after the date the authority issued the tax credit to the
eligible business.
Sec. 15. NEW SECTION. 15.509 Other incentives.
1. An eligible business may apply for and be eligible to
receive other federal, state, and local incentives in addition
to the tax incentives issued by the authority to the eligible
business under the program.
2. The authority, in its discretion, may prohibit an
eligible business that has been issued tax incentives under
the program from receiving any additional tax incentive, tax
credit, grant, loan, or other financial assistance under any
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-18- nls/ko 18/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
program administered by the authority.
Sec. 16. NEW SECTION. 15.510 Property tax exemption.
1. A community in which an eligible business’s project
is located may grant the eligible business a property
tax exemption for a portion of the actual value added by
improvements to real property through the project. The
community may allow a property tax exemption for a period not
to exceed ten years beginning the year that the improvements to
real property are first assessed for taxation.
2. For purposes of this section, “improvements” means new
construction, and rehabilitation of and additions to existing
structures.
3. A property tax exemption granted under subsection 1 shall
apply to all taxing districts, except for school districts, in
which the real property is located.
Sec. 17. NEW SECTION. 15.511 Financial assistance for
certain eligible businesses.
1. The authority may provide financial assistance pursuant
to section 15.111, subsection 2, paragraph “a”, subparagraph
(8), if the authority and the board find such assistance
necessary to facilitate the project’s successful completion,
that the project has an extensive economic impact, or that
financial assistance will incentivize an eligible business to
choose an Iowa location, rather than an out-of-state location,
for an eligible business’s location.
2. Each eligible business receiving assistance under this
section shall enter into an agreement with the authority and
the agreement shall meet the requirements of section 15.506.
3. If the authority and the board determine financial
assistance should be awarded, the authority and the board shall
determine the appropriate amount and type of assistance for
facilitating the eligible business’s project.
Sec. 18. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. The Code editor is directed
to designate sections 15.502 through 15.511, as enacted in this
division of this Act, as part 33 of subchapter II.
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-19- nls/ko 19/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Sec. 19. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being
deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment.
DIVISION IV
ELIMINATION OF THE HIGH QUALITY JOBS PROGRAM
Sec. 20. REPEAL. Sections 15.326, 15.327, 15.329, 15.330,
15.330A, 15.331A, 15.331C, 15.332, 15.333, 15.333A, 15.335,
15.335A, 15.335B, 15.335C, and 15.336, Code 2025, are repealed.
Sec. 21. TRANSITION PROVISIONS. An agreement entered into
on or before December 31, 2025, by a business and the economic
development authority pursuant to section 15.330, Code 2025, or
amended pursuant to section 15.330A, Code 2025, shall be valid
and continue per the terms of the agreement.
Sec. 22. PRESERVATION OF EXISTING RIGHTS. This division of
this Act shall not limit, modify, or otherwise adversely affect
any amount of tax incentive issued, awarded, or allowed before
December 31, 2025, nor shall it limit, modify, or otherwise
adversely affect a taxpayer’s right to claim or redeem a tax
incentive issued, awarded, or allowed before December 31, 2025,
including but not limited to any tax credit carry forward
amount.
Sec. 23. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act takes
effect December 31, 2025.
DIVISION V
HIGH QUALITY JOBS PROGRAM
CONFORMING CHANGES
Sec. 24. Section 2.48, subsection 3, paragraph a,
subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended by striking the
subparagraph.
Sec. 25. Section 2.48, subsection 3, paragraph a,
subparagraph (2), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The tax credits for increasing research activities
available under sections 15.335, 422.10, and 422.33.
Sec. 26. Section 8G.3, subsection 8, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
8. “Tax exemption or credit” means an exclusion from
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-20- nls/ko 20/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
the operation or collection of a tax imposed in this state.
Tax exemption or credit includes tax credits, exemptions,
deductions, and rebates. “Tax exemption or credit” also
includes sales tax refunds if such refunds are applied for and
granted as a form of financial assistance, including but not
limited to the refunds allowed in sections 15.331A 15.507 and
423.4.
Sec. 27. Section 15.106B, subsection 5, paragraph b, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
b. Fees collected by the authority pursuant to this
subsection shall be deposited in a fund within the state
treasury created pursuant to section 15.106A, subsection 1,
paragraph “o”, and are appropriated to the authority for the
purposes set out in section 15.106A, subsection 1, paragraph
“o”. However, fees collected by the authority pursuant to
section 15.330, subsection 12, section 15E.198, Code 2014, and
section 15.354, subsection 3, paragraph “b”, shall be used
exclusively for costs associated with the administration of due
diligence and compliance.
Sec. 28. Section 15.293B, subsection 3, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
3. If an investor is awarded a tax credit pursuant to this
section, the authority and the investor shall enter into an
agreement concerning the qualifying redevelopment project. If
the investor fails to comply with any of the requirements of
the agreement, the authority may find the investor in default
under the agreement and may revoke all or a portion of the tax
credit award. The department of revenue, upon notification
by the authority of an event of default, shall seek repayment
of the value of any such tax credit already claimed in the
same manner as provided in section 15.330, subsection 2. The
repayment of incentives pursuant to this subsection shall be
considered a tax payment due and payable to the department of
revenue by any taxpayer who has claimed such incentives, and
the failure to make such a repayment may be treated by the
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-21- nls/ko 21/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
department of revenue in the same manner as a failure to pay
the tax shown due or required to be shown due with the filing of
a return or deposit form. In addition, the county shall have
the authority to take action to recover the value of property
taxes not collected as a result of the exemption provided to
the business under this part.
Sec. 29. Section 15.317, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
5. The business shall not be relocating or reducing
operations as described in section 15.329, subsection 1,
paragraph “b” follows, and as determined under the discretion
of the authority.:
a. The business shall not be solely relocating operations
from one area of the state. A project that does not create new
jobs or involve a substantial amount of new capital investment
shall be presumed to be a relocation. In determining whether a
business is solely relocating operations for purposes of this
paragraph, the authority shall consider a letter of support for
the move from the affected local community.
b. The business shall not be in the process of reducing
operations in one community while simultaneously applying for
the program. For purposes of this paragraph, a reduction in
operations within twelve months before or after an application
is submitted to the authority shall be presumed to be a
reduction in operations while simultaneously applying for
assistance under the program.
c. This subsection shall not be construed to prohibit
a business from expanding its operation in a community if
existing operations of a similar nature in this state are not
closed or substantially reduced.
Sec. 30. Section 15.318, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
b. The compliance Compliance cost fees authorized in section
15.330, subsection 12, shall apply to all agreements entered
into under this program and shall be collected by the authority
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-22- nls/ko 22/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
in the same manner and to the same extent as described in that
subsection. in the amount and manner as follows:
(1) The imposition of a one-time compliance cost fee of five
hundred dollars to be collected by the authority prior to the
issuance of a tax incentive certificate.
(2) The imposition of a compliance cost fee equal to
one-half of one percent of the value of tax incentives claimed
pursuant to an agreement that has an aggregate tax incentive
value of one hundred thousand dollars or greater. The
authority shall collect the fee from the business after the
tax incentive is claimed by the business from the department
of revenue.
Sec. 31. Section 15.318, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
4. Termination and repayment. The failure by an eligible
business in fulfilling any requirement of the program or any of
the terms and obligations of an agreement entered into pursuant
to this section may result in the reduction, termination, or
rescission of the tax credits under section 15.319 and may
subject the eligible business to the repayment or recapture of
tax credits claimed. The repayment or recapture of tax credits
pursuant to this subsection shall be accomplished in the same
manner as provided in section 15.330, subsection 2 considered
a tax payment due and payable to the department of revenue by
any taxpayer who has claimed such incentives, and the failure
to make such a repayment may be treated by the department of
revenue in the same manner as a failure to pay the tax shown
due or required to be shown due with the filing of a return or
deposit form.
Sec. 32. Section 15.354, subsection 1, paragraph b,
subparagraph (2), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(2) A report that meets the requirements and conditions
of section 15.330, subsection 9 submitted to the authority
by a business together with its application describing all
violations of environmental law or worker safety law within
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-23- nls/ko 23/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
the last five years. If, upon review of the application, the
authority finds that the business has a record of violations
of the law, statutes, or rules that tends to show a consistent
pattern, the authority shall not provide incentives or
assistance to the business unless the authority finds either
that the violations did not seriously affect public health,
public safety, or the environment, or, if such violations
did seriously affect public health, public safety, or the
environment, that mitigating circumstances were present.
Sec. 33. Section 15.354, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code
2025, is amended by striking the paragraph.
Sec. 34. Section 15.354, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
b. The compliance Compliance cost fees imposed in section
15.330, subsection 12, shall apply to all agreements entered
into under this program and shall be collected by the authority
in the same manner and to the same extent as described in that
subsection. in the amount and manner as follows:
(1) The imposition of a one-time compliance cost fee of five
hundred dollars to be collected by the authority prior to the
issuance of a tax incentive certificate or the disbursement of
financial assistance.
(2) The imposition of a compliance cost fee equal to
one-half of one percent of the value of tax incentives claimed
pursuant to an agreement that has an aggregate tax incentive
value of one hundred thousand dollars or greater. The
authority shall collect the fee from the business after the
tax incentive is claimed by the business from the department
of revenue.
Sec. 35. Section 15.354, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
5. Termination and repayment. The failure by a housing
business in completing a housing project to comply with any
requirement of this program or any of the terms and obligations
of an agreement entered into pursuant to this section may
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-24- nls/ko 24/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
result in the revocation, reduction, termination, or rescission
of the tax incentive award or the approved tax incentives and
may subject the housing business to the repayment or recapture
of tax incentives claimed under section 15.355. The repayment
or recapture of tax incentives pursuant to this section shall
be accomplished in the same manner as provided in section
15.330, subsection 2 considered a tax payment due and payable
to the department of revenue by any taxpayer who has claimed
such incentives, and the failure to make such a repayment may
be treated by the department of revenue in the same manner as
a failure to pay the tax shown due or required to be shown due
with the filing of a return or deposit form.
Sec. 36. Section 15.499, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
1. Except for the high quality jobs program administered
by the authority pursuant to sections 15.326 through 15.336,
and the targeted jobs withholding credit pursuant to section
403.19A, an eligible business may apply for and be eligible to
receive other federal, state, and local incentives in addition
to the tax incentives issued by the authority to the eligible
business under the program.
Sec. 37. Section 15E.351, subsection 1, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
1. The authority shall establish and administer a business
accelerator program to provide financial assistance for
the establishment and operation of a business accelerator
for technology-based, value-added agricultural, information
solutions, alternative and renewable energy including the
alternative and renewable energy sectors listed in section
476.42, subsection 1, paragraph “a”, subparagraph (1), or
advanced manufacturing start-up businesses or for a satellite
of an existing business accelerator. The program shall be
designed to foster the accelerated growth of new and existing
businesses through the provision of technical assistance. The
authority may provide financial assistance under this section
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-25- nls/ko 25/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
from moneys allocated for financial assistance for business
accelerators pursuant to section 15.335B, subsection 2.
Sec. 38. Section 15E.362, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
c. “Financial assistance” means the same as defined in
section 15.327 assistance provided only from the funds, rights,
and assets legally available to the authority pursuant to
chapter 15 and includes but is not limited to assistance in the
form of grants, loans, forgivable loans, and royalty payments.
Sec. 39. Section 15H.5, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
2. The Iowa summer youth corps program is established
to provide meaningful summer enrichment programming to Iowa
youth. The program shall be administered by the commission
using a competitive grant process to implement projects in
accordance with program requirements. The commission shall
adopt administrative rules for the program, including but not
limited to incentives, grant criteria, and grantee selection
processes. A percentage of the grants shall be designated by
the commission to address the needs of economically distressed
areas as defined in section 15.335C.
Sec. 40. Section 15H.5, subsection 5, paragraph c, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
c. The commission shall give priority consideration
to approving those projects that target communities that
have disproportionately high rates of juvenile crime or low
rates of high school graduation or that have been designated
as an economically distressed areas as defined in section
15.335Carea.
Sec. 41. Section 15H.5, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 7. For purposes of this section,
“economically distressed area” means a county that meets at
least three of the following criteria:
a. The county ranks among the thirty-three Iowa counties
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-26- nls/ko 26/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
with the highest average monthly unemployment rates for the
most recent twelve-month period based on the applicable local
area unemployment statistics produced by the United States
department of labor, bureau of labor statistics.
b. The county ranks among the thirty-three Iowa counties
with the highest average annualized unemployment rates for the
most recent five-year period based on the applicable local
area unemployment statistics produced by the United States
department of labor, bureau of labor statistics.
c. The county ranks among the thirty-three Iowa counties
with the lowest annual average weekly wages based on the most
recent quarterly census of employment and wages published
by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor
statistics.
d. The county ranks among the thirty-three Iowa counties
with the highest family poverty rates based on the most recent
American community survey five-year estimate released by the
United States census bureau.
e. The county ranks among the thirty-three Iowa counties
with the highest percentage population loss. Percentage
population loss shall be calculated by comparing the most
recent population estimate produced by the United States
census bureau to the most recent decennial census released
by the United States census bureau, except for a calendar
year in which the decennial census data is released, then the
percentage population loss shall be calculated by comparing the
population in the decennial census released that calendar year
to the population in the decennial census released ten years
prior.
f. The county ranks among the thirty-three Iowa counties
with the highest percentage of persons sixty-five years of age
or older based on the most recent American community survey
five-year estimate released by the United States census bureau.
Sec. 42. Section 159A.6B, subsection 2, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-27- nls/ko 27/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
2. The office may execute contracts in order to provide
technical support and outreach services for purposes of
assisting and educating interested persons as provided in this
section. The office may also contract with a consultant to
provide part or all of these services. The office may require
that a person receiving assistance pursuant to this section
contribute up to fifty percent of the amount required to
support the costs of contracting with the consultant to provide
assistance to the person. The office shall assist the person
in completing any technical information required in order
to receive financial assistance by the economic development
authority pursuant to section 15.335B 15.511.
Sec. 43. Section 266.19, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
266.19 Renewable fuel —— assistance.
The university shall cooperate in assisting renewable fuel
production facilities supporting livestock operations managed
by persons receiving financial assistance pursuant to section
15.335B 15.511.
Sec. 44. Section 422.10, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended
by striking the subsection.
Sec. 45. Section 422.11F, subsection 2, Code 2025, is
amended by striking the subsection.
Sec. 46. Section 422.33, subsection 5, paragraph h, Code
2025, is amended by striking the paragraph.
Sec. 47. Section 422.33, subsection 12, paragraph b, Code
2025, is amended by striking the paragraph.
Sec. 48. Section 422.33, subsection 19, Code 2025, is
amended by striking the subsection.
Sec. 49. Section 422.60, subsection 5, paragraph b, Code
2025, is amended by striking the paragraph.
Sec. 50. Section 422.60, subsection 8, Code 2025, is amended
by striking the subsection.
Sec. 51. Section 427B.17, subsection 8, paragraph b, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-28- nls/ko 28/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
b. Any electric power generating plant which operated during
the preceding assessment year at a net capacity factor of more
than twenty percent, shall not receive the benefits of this
section or of section 15.332.
Sec. 52. Section 432.12C, subsection 2, Code 2025, is
amended by striking the subsection.
Sec. 53. Section 455B.104, subsection 2, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
2. The department shall assist persons applying for
financial assistance to establish and operate renewable fuel
production facilities pursuant to section 15.335B 15.511.
Sec. 54. Section 533.329, subsection 2, paragraphs c and d,
Code 2025, are amended by striking the paragraphs.
Sec. 55. REPEAL. Sections 15E.231, 15E.232, 15E.233,
422.11U, and 432.12H, Code 2025, are repealed.
Sec. 56. PRESERVATION OF EXISTING RIGHTS. The sections of
this division of this Act amending sections 422.10, 422.11F,
422.11U, 422.33, 422.60, 432.12C, 432.12H, and 533.329 shall
not limit, modify, or otherwise adversely affect any amount of
tax incentive issued, awarded, or allowed before December 31,
2025, nor shall it limit, modify, or otherwise adversely affect
a taxpayer’s right to claim or redeem a tax incentive issued,
awarded, or allowed before December 31, 2025, including but not
limited to any tax credit carryforward amount.
Sec. 57. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act takes
effect December 31, 2025.
DIVISION VI
SEED INVESTOR TAX CREDIT PROGRAM
Sec. 58. NEW SECTION. 15E.25 Purpose.
The purpose of this subchapter is to stimulate job growth,
create wealth, and accelerate the creation of new ventures by
using investment tax credits to incentivize the transfer of
capital from investors to entrepreneurs, particularly during
early-stage growth.
Sec. 59. NEW SECTION. 15E.26 Definitions.
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-29- nls/ko 29/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
For purposes of this subchapter, unless the context
otherwise requires:
1. “Affiliate” means a spouse, child, or sibling of an
investor or a corporation, partnership, or trust in which an
investor has a controlling equity interest or in which an
investor exercises management control.
2. “Authority” means the economic development authority
created in section 15.105.
3. “Entrepreneurial assistance program” includes the
entrepreneur investment awards program administered under
section 15E.362, the receipt of services from a service
provider engaged pursuant to section 15.411, subsection 1, or
the program administered under section 15.411, subsection 2.
4. “Investment” means a minimum cash investment of ten
thousand dollars in a qualifying business.
5. “Investor” means a person making a cash investment in
a qualifying business. “Investor” does not include a person
that holds at least a seventy percent ownership interest as an
owner, member, or shareholder in a qualifying business.
6. “Qualifying business” means a business meeting the
criteria defined in section 15E.28.
7. “Rural area” means a city that has a population of
fifteen thousand or less.
8. “Urban area” means a city that has a population of
greater than fifteen thousand.
Sec. 60. NEW SECTION. 15E.27 Investment tax credits.
1. a. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025,
a tax credit shall be allowed against the taxes imposed in
chapter 422, subchapters II, III, and V, and in chapter 432,
and against the moneys and credits tax imposed in section
533.329, for a portion of a taxpayer’s equity investment, as
provided in subsection 2, in a qualifying business.
b. An individual may claim a tax credit under this section
of a partnership, limited liability company, S corporation,
estate, or trust electing to have income taxed directly to
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-30- nls/ko 30/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
the individual. The amount claimed by the individual shall
be based upon the pro rata share of the individual’s earnings
from the partnership, limited liability company, S corporation,
estate, or trust.
c. A tax credit shall be allowed only for an investment
made in the form of cash to purchase equity in a qualifying
business.
d. An affiliate of a qualifying business or an affiliate of
a qualifying business’s principals shall not be eligible for a
tax credit under this section.
e. (1) For a tax credit claimed against the taxes imposed
on any of the following, any tax credit in excess of the tax
liability is refundable:
(a) A tax credit claimed against the taxes imposed in
chapter 422, subchapters II, III, and V.
(b) A tax credit claimed against the taxes imposed in
chapter 432.
(c) A tax credit claimed against the moneys and credits tax
imposed in section 533.329.
(2) A tax credit shall not be carried back to a tax year
prior to the tax year in which the taxpayer redeems the tax
credit.
2. a. The amount of the tax credit shall equal twenty
percent of the taxpayer’s equity investment if the qualifying
business is located in an urban area at the time of the
investment. The amount of the tax credit shall equal
thirty-five percent of the taxpayer’s equity investment if the
qualifying business is located in a rural area at the time of
the investment.
b. The maximum amount of a tax credit that may be issued
per fiscal year to a natural person and the person’s spouse
or dependent shall not exceed one hundred thousand dollars
combined. For purposes of this paragraph, a tax credit issued
to a partnership, limited liability company, S corporation,
estate, or trust electing to have income taxed directly to
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-31- nls/ko 31/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
the individual shall be deemed to be issued to the individual
owners based upon the pro rata share of the individual’s
earnings from the entity. For purposes of this paragraph,
“dependent” has the same meaning as provided by the Internal
Revenue Code.
c. The maximum amount of tax credits that may be issued
per fiscal year for equity investments in any one qualifying
business shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars.
3. An investment shall be deemed to have been made on the
same date as the date of acquisition of the equity interest as
determined by the Internal Revenue Code.
4. The authority shall not issue tax credits under this
section in excess of the amount approved by the authority for
any one fiscal year pursuant to section 15.119, subsection 2,
paragraph “a”.
5. A tax credit shall not be transferred to any other
person.
6. The authority shall develop a system for registration and
issuance of tax credits authorized pursuant to this subchapter
and shall control distribution of all tax credit certificates
to investors pursuant to this subchapter. The authority
shall develop rules for the qualification and administration
of qualifying businesses. The department of revenue shall
adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A as necessary for the
administration of this subchapter.
Sec. 61. NEW SECTION. 15E.28 Qualifying businesses.
1. a. In order for an equity investment to qualify for
a tax credit, the qualifying business shall submit a joint
application to the authority consisting of an investor section
and a section for the business. An application shall not be
considered to be submitted unless or until both the investor
and the business have completed and submitted the investor’s
and business’s parts of the application, including payment of a
nonrefundable application fee.
b. Applications shall be submitted to the authority by March
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-32- nls/ko 32/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
31 of each year. The authority shall award the tax credits
based upon the amount received.
2. In order to be a qualifying business, a business must
meet all of the following criteria:
a. The principal business operations, and a majority of
employees, of the business are located in this state.
b. The business has been in operation for five years or
less.
c. The business has at least one full-time equivalent
employee.
d. The business’s primary operations are in advanced
manufacturing, bioscience, insurance and finance, and
technologies.
e. The business is an independent organization that is not
part of, or an affiliate of, a larger parent company.
f. The business shall establish that its owners, directors,
officers, and employees have an appropriate level of experience
consistent with the nature of the business. The authority may
consult with outside service providers to determine whether a
business meets the requirement of this paragraph. A business
that has participated in an entrepreneurial assistance program
shall be presumed to meet the requirement of this paragraph.
g. The business is not a business engaged primarily in
retail sales, real estate, or the provision of health care or
other services that require a professional license.
h. The business shall not have a net worth that exceeds two
million dollars.
i. The business shall have secured all of the following at
the time of application for tax credits:
(1) At least two investors. For purposes of this
subparagraph, “investor” includes a person who executes a
binding investment commitment to a business.
(2) Total equity financing, binding investment commitments,
or some combination thereof, equal to at least five hundred
thousand dollars, from investors.
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-33- nls/ko 33/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
3. A qualifying business shall have the burden of proof
to demonstrate to the authority its qualifications under this
section, and shall have the obligation to notify the authority
in a timely manner of any changes in the qualifications of
the business or in the eligibility of investors to redeem the
investment tax credits in any tax year.
4. After verifying the eligibility of a qualifying
business, the authority shall issue a tax credit certificate
to be included with the equity investor’s tax return. The tax
credit certificate must contain the taxpayer’s name, address,
tax identification number, the amount of credit, the name of
the qualifying business, and other information required by the
department of revenue. The tax credit certificate, unless
rescinded by the authority, shall be accepted by the department
of revenue as payment for taxes imposed pursuant to chapter
422, subchapters II, III, and V, and in chapter 432, and for
the moneys and credits tax imposed in section 533.329, subject
to any conditions or restrictions placed by the authority upon
the face of the tax credit certificate and subject to the
limitations of section 15E.27.
Sec. 62. NEW SECTION. 15E.29 Confidentiality —— reports.
1. Except as provided in subsection 2, all information or
records in the possession of the authority with respect to this
subchapter shall be presumed by the authority to be a trade
secret protected under chapter 550 or common law, and shall be
kept confidential by the authority unless otherwise ordered by
a court.
2. All of the following shall be considered public
information under chapter 22:
a. The identity of a qualifying business.
b. The identity of an investor and the qualifying business
in which the investor made an equity investment.
c. The number of tax credit certificates issued by the
authority.
d. The total dollar amount of tax credits issued by the
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-34- nls/ko 34/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
authority.
3. The authority shall include as part of the annual
report under section 15.107B a listing of eligible qualifying
businesses, the number of tax credit certificates, and the
amount of tax credits issued by the authority in each fiscal
year.
Sec. 63. Section 15E.52, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
a. To receive a tax credit, a taxpayer must submit an
application to the board. The board shall issue certificates
under this section on a first-come, first-served basis, which
certificates may be redeemed for tax credits. The board shall
issue such certificates so that not more than the amount
allocated for such tax credits under section 15.119, subsection
2, paragraph “a”, may be claimed. The board shall not issue a
certificate before September 1, 2014.
Sec. 64. Section 15E.52, subsection 7, paragraph g, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
g. The fund proposes to obtain at least fifteen three
million dollars in binding investment commitments and to invest
a minimum of fifteen three million dollars in companies that
have a principal place of business in the state.
Sec. 65. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. The Code editor is directed
to do the following:
1. Entitle chapter 15E, subchapter IV, “Seed Investor Tax
Credit” and include sections 15E.25 through 15E.29.
2. Correct internal references in the Code and in enacted
legislation as necessary due to the enactment of this division
of this Act.
DIVISION VII
ELIMINATION OF INVESTMENTS IN QUALIFYING BUSINESSES TAX CREDIT
PROGRAM
Sec. 66. REPEAL. Sections 15E.41, 15E.42, 15E.43, 15E.44,
and 15E.46, Code 2025, are repealed.
Sec. 67. TRANSITION PROVISIONS. A tax credit issued by the
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-35- nls/ko 35/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
economic development authority to a taxpayer before June 30,
2026, for an investment in a qualifying business pursuant to
chapter 15E, subchapter V, Code 2025, shall remain valid per
the terms under which the tax credit was issued by the economic
development authority, and the provisions of chapter 15E,
subchapter V, Code 2025.
DIVISION VIII
INVESTMENTS IN QUALIFYING BUSINESS TAX CREDIT PROGRAM ——
CONFORMING CHANGES
Sec. 68. Section 2.48, subsection 3, paragraph d,
subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended by striking the
subparagraph.
Sec. 69. Section 15E.52, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
4. A taxpayer shall not claim a tax credit under this
section if the taxpayer is a venture capital investment fund
allocation manager for the Iowa fund of funds created in
section 15E.65 or an investor that receives a tax credit for
the same investment in a qualifying business as described in
section 15E.44 or in a community-based seed capital fund as
described in section 15E.45, Code 2015 15E.28.
Sec. 70. Section 422.11F, subsection 1, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
1. The taxes imposed under this subchapter, less the credits
allowed under section 422.12, shall be reduced by an investment
tax credit authorized pursuant to section 15E.43 15E.27 for an
investment in a qualifying business.
Sec. 71. Section 422.33, subsection 12, paragraph a, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
a. The taxes imposed under this subchapter shall be reduced
by an investment tax credit authorized pursuant to section
15E.43 15E.27 for an investment in a qualifying business.
Sec. 72. Section 422.60, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
a. The taxes imposed under this subchapter shall be reduced
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-36- nls/ko 36/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
by an investment tax credit authorized pursuant to section
15E.43 15E.27 for an investment in a qualifying business.
Sec. 73. Section 432.12C, subsection 1, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
1. The tax imposed under this chapter shall be reduced by
an investment tax credit authorized pursuant to section 15E.43
15E.27 for an investment in a qualifying business.
Sec. 74. Section 533.329, subsection 2, paragraph e, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
e. The moneys and credits tax imposed under this section
shall be reduced by an investment tax credit authorized
pursuant to section 15E.43 15E.27.
Sec. 75. PRESERVATION OF EXISTING RIGHTS. The sections of
this division of this Act amending sections 422.11F, 422.33,
422.60, 432.12C, and 533.329 shall not limit, modify, or
otherwise adversely affect any amount of investment tax credit
under section 15E.43, Code 2025, that was issued, awarded,
or allowed before July 1, 2026, and shall not limit, modify,
or otherwise adversely affect a taxpayer’s right to claim or
redeem an investment tax credit under section 15E.43, Code
2025, that was issued, awarded, or allowed before July 1,
2026, including but not limited to any tax credit carryforward
amount.
DIVISION IX
IOWA FILM PRODUCTION INCENTIVE PROGRAM AND FUND
Sec. 76. NEW SECTION. 15.517 Iowa film production incentive
program.
1. As used in this section:
a. “Fund” means the Iowa film production incentive fund.
b. “Program” means the Iowa film production incentive
program.
c. “Qualified expenditure” means an allowed expense, as
determined by the authority by rule, that is incurred by a
qualified production facility on or after July 1, 2025, but
before July 1, 2027, for producing a qualified production.
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-37- nls/ko 37/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
d. “Qualified production” means a feature film, television
series, documentary, or unscripted series that is rated G, PG,
PG-13, or R by the classification and ratings administration of
the motion picture association of America or the TV parental
guidelines monitoring board.
e. “Qualified production facility” or “facility” means any
of the following:
(1) A dedicated studio located in this state at which
qualified productions can be produced.
(2) A studio located in this state at which all
preproduction and film production take place for a qualified
production filmed on location in this state.
2. a. The authority shall establish and administer an Iowa
film production incentive program for the purpose of providing
rebates to qualified production facilities for qualified
expenditures.
b. The authority shall establish eligibility criteria for
the program by rule.
(1) The eligibility criteria for qualified production
facilities must require that a facility have all of the
following:
(a) A soundstage with dimensions covering at least twelve
thousand five hundred square feet of floor space.
(b) A permanent grid system or an alternative rigging
support structure rated for overhead suspension, or on-site
resources for fly rigging.
(c) Production and postproduction sound rooms that are
sound treated to meet sound engineer-approved ambient noise
level ratings.
(d) Electric service from an electric utility, or
sufficient electric service that does not require use of an
electric generator.
(e) An agreement between the authority and the facility that
the phrase “filmed in Iowa” appears at the beginning of any
credits in the qualified production.
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-38- nls/ko 38/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
(2) The eligibility criteria for a qualified production
must include:
(a) A production budget of at least one million dollars and
evidence the production budget is fully funded.
(b) Availability to the public for viewing at a venue where
admission is charged, or availability for purchase, for rental,
or through a streaming service that requires a subscription.
(3) The eligibility criteria for qualified expenditures
must include the following:
(a) The requirements for substantiation of and submission
of expenses for industry standard activities including expenses
for cast members, equipment, studio production facilities,
hospitality services, certified public accountant services,
per diem payments, payments to businesses located in this
state, accommodations, and any other expenses allowed by the
authority. Qualified expenditures shall not include expenses
for entertainment, studio executive airfare, royalties, and
publicity for the qualified production.
(b) Written acknowledgment by the qualified production
facility that no qualified expenses were incurred prior to
approval of the application by the authority.
3. An application for a rebate under the program shall be
submitted by a qualified production facility to the authority
for approval in the form and manner prescribed by the authority
by rule.
4. a. If a qualified production facility’s application
is approved by the authority, the maximum rebate paid to the
facility under the program shall equal thirty percent of the
facility’s qualified expenditures excluding any sales, use, and
hotel and motel taxes paid.
b. Prior to disbursement of the rebate, a qualified
production facility shall submit all of the following to the
authority at the expense of the facility:
(1) An examination of the qualified expenditures completed
by a certified public accountant, as defined in section
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-39- nls/ko 39/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
542.3, in accordance with the currently effective statements
on standards for attestation engagements established by the
American institute of certified public accountants.
(2) A statement of the final amount of qualified
expenditures.
(3) Any other information the authority deems necessary to
ensure compliance with this section.
5. a. An Iowa film production incentive fund is created
in the state treasury under the control of the authority. The
fund shall consist of moneys appropriated to the authority and
any other moneys available to, obtained by, or accepted by the
authority for placement in the fund. The fund shall be used to
provide rebates under the program.
b. The cumulative value of rebates claimed by qualified
production facilities pursuant to this section shall not exceed
ten million dollars.
c. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund
that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the
fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for
expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of
the succeeding fiscal year. Notwithstanding section 12C.7,
interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited
to the fund.
6. The authority shall not use more than five percent of
the moneys in the fund at the beginning of each fiscal year for
purposes of administrative costs, technical assistance, and
other program support.
7. The authority shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A
to administer this section.
8. This section is repealed July 1, 2027.
Sec. 77. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. The Code editor shall
designate section 15.517, as enacted in this division of this
Act, as part 34 of subchapter II.
DIVISION X
TARGETED JOBS WITHHOLDING CREDIT MODIFICATIONS AND REPEAL
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-40- nls/ko 40/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Sec. 78. Section 2.48, subsection 3, paragraph b,
subparagraph (2), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(2) (a) The targeted jobs withholding credits available
under section 403.19A.
(b) This subparagraph is repealed January 1, 2038.
Sec. 79. Section 403.19A, subsection 3, paragraphs a, b, and
j, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows:
a. A pilot project city may provide by resolution for the
deposit into a designated withholding project fund of the
targeted jobs withholding credit described in this section.
The targeted jobs withholding credit shall be based upon the
wages paid to employees pursuant to a withholding agreement.
An employer entering into a withholding agreement on or after
the effective date of this division of this Act shall not be
credited the payments made by the employer pursuant to section
422.16 after June 30, 2027.
b. (1) An For an agreement entered into prior to the
effective date of this division of this Act, an amount equal
to three percent of the gross wages paid by an employer to each
employee under a withholding agreement shall be credited from
the payment made by the employer pursuant to section 422.16.
If the amount of the withholding by the employer is less than
three percent of the gross wages paid to the employees covered
by the withholding agreement, the employer shall receive a
credit against other withholding taxes due by the employer
or may carry the credit forward for up to ten years or until
depleted, whichever is the earlier. The employer shall remit
the amount of the credit quarterly, in the same manner as
withholding payments are reported to the department of revenue,
to the pilot project city to be allocated to and when collected
paid into a designated withholding project fund for the
project. All amounts so deposited shall be used or pledged by
the pilot project city for a project related to the employer
pursuant to the withholding agreement.
(2) For an agreement entered into on or after the effective
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-41- nls/ko 41/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
date of this division of this Act, an amount equal to one
and one-half percent of the gross wages paid by an employer
to each employee under a withholding agreement shall be
credited from the payment made by the employer pursuant to
section 422.16. The employer shall remit the amount of the
credit quarterly, in the same manner as withholding payments
are reported to the department of revenue, to the pilot
project city to be allocated to and when collected paid into
a designated withholding project fund for the project. All
amounts so deposited shall be used or pledged by the pilot
project city for a project related to the employer pursuant to
the withholding agreement.
j. (1) An employer may participate in a new jobs credit
from withholding under section 260E.5, or a supplemental new
jobs credit from withholding under section 15E.197, Code 2014,
or under section 15.331, Code 2005, at the same time as the
employer is participating in the withholding credit under this
section. Notwithstanding any other provision in this section,
the new jobs credit from withholding under section 260E.5, and
the supplemental new jobs credit from withholding under section
15E.197, Code 2014, or under section 15.331, Code 2005, shall
be collected and disbursed prior to the withholding credit
under this section.
(2) An employer shall not be eligible to participate in the
MEGA program in chapter 15, subchapter II, part 32.
Sec. 80. Section 403.19A, Code 2025, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 4. This section is repealed January 1,
2038.
Sec. 81. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being
deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment.
DIVISION XI
EMPLOYER CHILD CARE TAX CREDIT REPEAL
Sec. 82. Section 237A.31, subsection 1, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-42- nls/ko 42/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
1. The taxes imposed under chapter 422, subchapter II or
III, the franchise tax imposed under chapter 422, subchapter
V, the gross premiums tax under chapter 432, or the moneys and
credits tax imposed under section 533.329 shall be reduced
by an employer child care tax credit through the tax year
beginning on or after January 1, 2025, but before January 1,
2026, equal to the proportion of the federal employer-provided
child care tax credit provided in section 45F of the Internal
Revenue Code the taxpayer was eligible for in the same tax year
attributable to expenditures made in this state.
Sec. 83. Section 237A.31, Code 2025, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 5. This section is repealed January 1,
2031.
Sec. 84. Section 422.12O, Code 2025, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 3. This section is repealed January 1,
2031.
Sec. 85. Section 422.33, subsection 32, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
32. a. The taxes imposed under this subchapter shall be
reduced by an employer child care tax credit allowed pursuant
to section 237A.31.
b. This subsection is repealed January 1, 2031.
Sec. 86. Section 422.60, subsection 15, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
15. a. The taxes imposed under this subchapter shall be
reduced by an employer child care tax credit allowed pursuant
to section 237A.31.
b. This subsection is repealed January 1, 2031.
Sec. 87. Section 432.12O, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
432.12O Employer child care tax credit.
1. The taxes imposed under this chapter shall be reduced by
an employer child care tax credit allowed pursuant to section
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-43- nls/ko 43/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
237A.31.
2. This section is repealed January 1, 2031.
Sec. 88. Section 533.329, subsection 2, paragraph m, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
m. (1) The moneys and credits tax imposed under this
section shall be reduced by an employer child care tax credit
allowed pursuant to section 237A.31.
(2) This paragraph is repealed January 1, 2031.
DIVISION XII
ASSISTIVE DEVICE TAX CREDIT REPEAL
Sec. 89. Section 2.48, subsection 3, paragraph e,
subparagraph (5), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(5) (a) The assistive device corporate tax credit under
section 422.33.
(b) This subparagraph is repealed January 1, 2031.
Sec. 90. Section 422.33, subsection 9, paragraph a,
subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(1) The taxes imposed under this subchapter shall be
reduced by an assistive device tax credit through the tax year
beginning on or after January 1, 2024, but before January 1,
2025. A small business purchasing, renting, or modifying
an assistive device or making workplace modifications for
an individual with a disability who is employed or will
be employed by the small business is eligible, subject to
availability of credits, to receive this assistive device
tax credit which is equal to fifty percent of the first five
thousand dollars paid during the tax year for the purchase,
rental, or modification of the assistive device or for making
the workplace modifications. The following percentage of any
credit in excess of the tax liability shall be refunded with
interest in accordance with section 421.60, subsection 2,
paragraph “e”, as follows:
(a) For the tax year beginning on or after January 1, 2023,
but before January 1, 2024, ninety-five percent.
(b) For the tax year beginning on or after January 1, 2024,
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-44- nls/ko 44/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
but before January 1, 2025, ninety percent.
(c) For the tax year beginning on or after January 1, 2025,
but before January 1, 2026, eighty-five percent.
(d) For the tax year beginning on or after January 1, 2026,
but before January 1, 2027, eighty percent.
(e) For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027,
seventy-five percent.
Sec. 91. Section 422.33, subsection 9, Code 2025, is amended
by adding the following new paragraph:
NEW PARAGRAPH. d. This subsection is repealed January 1,
2031.
Sec. 92. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This division of this
Act applies retroactively to January 1, 2025, for tax years
beginning on or after that date.
DIVISION XIII
ENDOW IOWA TAX CREDIT REPEAL
Sec. 93. Section 2.48, subsection 3, paragraph c,
subparagraph (2), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(2) (a) The endow Iowa tax credits authorized under section
15E.305.
(b) This subparagraph is repealed January 1, 2031.
Sec. 94. Section 15E.303, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
15E.303 Definitions.
1. As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise
requires:
1. a. “Board” means the governing board of the lead
philanthropic entity identified by the authority pursuant to
section 15E.304, Code 2025.
2. b. “Business” means a business operating within the
state and includes individuals operating a sole proprietorship
or having rental, royalty, or farm income in this state and
includes a consortium of businesses.
3. c. “Community affiliate organization” means a group of
five or more community leaders or advocates organized for the
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-45- nls/ko 45/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
purpose of increasing philanthropic activity in an identified
community or geographic area in this state with the intention
of establishing a community affiliate endowment fund.
4. d. “Endow Iowa qualified community foundation” means a
community foundation organized or operating in this state that
attains the national standards established by the national
council on foundations as determined by the authority in
collaboration with the Iowa council of foundations.
5. e. “Endowment gift” means an irrevocable contribution to
a permanent endowment held by an endow Iowa qualified community
foundation.
6. f. “Lead philanthropic entity” means the entity
identified by the authority pursuant to section 15E.304, Code
2025.
2. This section is repealed January 1, 2031.
Sec. 95. Section 15E.305, subsection 1, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
1. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2003,
but before January 1, 2026, a tax credit shall be allowed
against the taxes imposed in chapter 422, subchapters II,
III, and V, and in chapter 432, and against the moneys and
credits tax imposed in section 533.329 equal to twenty-five
percent of a taxpayer’s endowment gift to an endow Iowa
qualified community foundation. An individual may claim a tax
credit under this section of a partnership, limited liability
company, S corporation, estate, or trust electing to have
income taxed directly to the individual. The amount claimed
by the individual shall be based upon the pro rata share of the
individual’s earnings from the partnership, limited liability
company, S corporation, estate, or trust. A tax credit shall
be allowed only for an endowment gift made to an endow Iowa
qualified community foundation for a permanent endowment
fund established to benefit a charitable cause in this state
for gifts made prior to July 1, 2025. The amount of the
endowment gift for which the tax credit is claimed shall not
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-46- nls/ko 46/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
be deductible in determining taxable income for state income
tax purposes. Any tax credit in excess of the taxpayer’s tax
liability for the tax year may be credited to the tax liability
for the following five years or until depleted, whichever
occurs first. A tax credit shall not be carried back to a tax
year prior to the tax year in which the taxpayer claims the tax
credit.
Sec. 96. Section 15E.305, Code 2025, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 5. This section is repealed January 1,
2031.
Sec. 97. Section 15E.311, subsection 4, paragraph c, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
c. “Eligible county recipient” means an endow Iowa qualified
community foundation or community affiliate organization, as
defined in section 15E.303, that is selected, in accordance
with the procedures described in section 15E.304, to receive
moneys from an account created in this section for a particular
county. To be selected as an eligible county recipient, a
community affiliate organization shall establish a county
affiliate fund to receive moneys as provided by this section.
Sec. 98. Section 15E.311, subsection 4, Code 2025, is
amended by adding the following new paragraphs:
NEW PARAGRAPH. 0c. “Community affiliate organization”
means a group of five or more community leaders or advocates
organized for the purpose of increasing philanthropic activity
in an identified community or geographic area in this state
with the intention of establishing a community affiliate
endowment fund.
NEW PARAGRAPH. d. “Iowa qualified community foundation”
means a community foundation organized or operating in this
state that attains the national standards established by the
national council on foundations as determined by the authority
in collaboration with the Iowa council of foundations.
Sec. 99. Section 15E.311, subsection 6, Code 2025, is
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-47- nls/ko 47/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
amended by striking the subsection.
Sec. 100. Section 422.11H, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
422.11H Endow Iowa tax credit.
1. The tax imposed under this subchapter, less the credits
allowed under section 422.12, shall be reduced by an endow Iowa
tax credit authorized pursuant to section 15E.305.
2. This section is repealed January 1, 2031.
Sec. 101. Section 422.33, subsection 14, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
14. a. The taxes imposed under this subchapter shall be
reduced by an endow Iowa tax credit authorized pursuant to
section 15E.305.
b. This subsection is repealed January 1, 2031.
Sec. 102. Section 422.60, subsection 6, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
6. a. The taxes imposed under this subchapter shall be
reduced by an endow Iowa tax credit authorized pursuant to
section 15E.305.
b. This subsection is repealed January 1, 2031.
Sec. 103. Section 432.12D, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
432.12D Endow Iowa tax credit.
1. The tax imposed under this chapter shall be reduced by an
endow Iowa tax credit authorized pursuant to section 15E.305.
2. This section is repealed January 1, 2031.
Sec. 104. Section 533.329, subsection 2, paragraph g, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
g. (1) The moneys and credits tax imposed under this
section shall be reduced by an endow Iowa tax credit authorized
pursuant to section 15E.305.
(2) This paragraph is repealed January 1, 2031.
Sec. 105. REPEAL. Sections 15E.301, 15E.302, and 15E.304,
Code 2025, are repealed.
DIVISION XIV
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-48- nls/ko 48/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
RESEARCH ACTIVITIES TAX CREDIT REPEAL
Sec. 106. Section 422.10, subsection 1, unnumbered
paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
The taxes imposed under this subchapter shall be reduced by
a state tax credit for increasing research activities in this
state through the tax year beginning on or after January 1,
2025, but before January 1, 2026.
Sec. 107. Section 422.10, subsection 1, paragraph b,
subparagraph (3), subparagraph division (d), subparagraph
subdivision (iv), Code 2025, is amended by striking the
subparagraph subdivision.
Sec. 108. Section 422.10, subsection 1, paragraph b,
subparagraph (3), subparagraph division (e), Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
(e) For tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2027 2026, amounts paid for supplies as defined in section
41(b)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not be qualified
research expenses in this state.
Sec. 109. Section 422.10, Code 2025, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 7. This section is repealed January 1,
2027.
Sec. 110. Section 422.33, subsection 5, paragraph a,
unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
The taxes imposed under this subchapter shall be reduced by
a state tax credit through the tax year beginning on or after
January 1, 2025, but before January 1, 2026, for increasing
research activities in this state equal to the sum of the
following:
Sec. 111. Section 422.33, subsection 5, paragraph b,
subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (d), subparagraph
subdivision (iv), Code 2025, is amended by striking the
subparagraph subdivision.
Sec. 112. Section 422.33, subsection 5, paragraph b,
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-49- nls/ko 49/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (e), Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
(e) For tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2027 2026, amounts paid for supplies as defined in section
41(b)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not be qualified
research expenses in this state.
Sec. 113. Section 422.33, subsection 5, Code 2025, is
amended by adding the following new paragraph:
NEW PARAGRAPH. j. This subsection is repealed January 1,
2027.
DIVISION XV
RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT TAX CREDIT PROGRAM
Sec. 114. NEW SECTION. 15.520 Short title.
This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Research
and Development Tax Credit Program”.
Sec. 115. NEW SECTION. 15.521 Definitions.
As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. “Eligible expenditures” means qualified research expenses
under section 41 of the Internal Revenue Code, to the extent
the expenditures occurred in this state.
2. “Qualified business” means a business certified by the
authority as eligible to claim the research and development tax
credit.
3. “Qualified research and development” means a systematic
activity that combines basic and applied research in an attempt
to discover solutions to new or existing problems, or to
create or update goods and services. “Qualified research and
development” includes a set of innovative activities undertaken
by an eligible business in developing new services or products,
and in improving existing ones.
Sec. 116. NEW SECTION. 15.522 Eligible businesses and
sectors.
1. The tax credit available pursuant to this part shall be
available only to a business primarily engaged in any of the
following:
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-50- nls/ko 50/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
a. Advanced manufacturing.
b. Bioscience.
c. Insurance and finance.
d. Technology and innovation.
2. For a business described in subsection 1, the sectors
available for the credit may include the following:
a. Second-generation food innovation.
b. Food ingredients and supplements.
c. Crop protection.
d. Hybrid seed technologies.
e. Diagnostic analytics and immunotherapies.
f. Chip technologies and microelectronics.
g. Medical equipment and supplies.
h. Software and technology.
i. Aerospace.
j. Pharmaceuticals.
k. Consumer products.
l. Any additional sectors included by the authority by rule.
Sec. 117. NEW SECTION. 15.523 Application, certification,
and agreement.
1. A business shall submit a preapplication to the authority
to determine whether the business is primarily engaged
in an eligible sector identified in section 15.522 and is
actively engaged in qualified research and development. The
determination made by the authority shall be based on factors
including but not limited to the North American industry
classification code and sources of revenue. The authority may
request any additional documentation or conduct site visits
to verify the requirements of the program are met upon the
submission of the preapplication.
2. The authority must certify a business as a qualified
business for the business to claim a research and development
tax credit. A qualified business may remain certified for up
to five years. A business may reapply for certification in
additional five-year increments.
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-51- nls/ko 51/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
3. An eligible business must enter into an agreement with
the authority for successful completion of all requirements of
the program.
4. Each year after certification as a qualified business,
the qualified business shall submit an application to the
authority for a tax credit based on the amount of eligible
expenditures that were made during the previous tax year.
Eligible expenditures must be reviewed by agreed upon
procedures prescribed by the authority by rule. The qualified
business shall engage an independent certified public
accountant authorized to practice in this state to conduct
the review. A business shall submit the application to the
authority by January 31 of each year the business is determined
to be a qualified business for research and development
conducted in the state in the most recently ended tax year of
the business.
Sec. 118. NEW SECTION. 15.524 Research and development tax
credit.
1. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, a
research and development tax credit is available to a qualified
business that is approved for the tax credit by the authority.
2. Upon review of the application pursuant to section
15.523, subsection 4, and approval by the authority to
receive the tax credit, the authority shall issue a tax credit
certificate to a qualified business indicating the amount
available to be claimed. The authority may approve a tax
credit in an amount up to three and one-half percent of the
amount of the qualified business’s eligible expenditures. The
tax credit shall be claimed for the tax year during which the
eligible expenditures were incurred.
3. To claim a tax credit under this section, a taxpayer
shall include one or more tax credit certificates with the
taxpayer’s tax return. The tax credit certificate must contain
the taxpayer’s name, address, tax identification number, the
amount of the credit, the name of the qualified business, and
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-52- nls/ko 52/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
any other information required by the department of revenue.
The tax credit certificate, unless rescinded by the authority,
shall be accepted by the department of revenue as payment for
taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 422, subchapters II and
III, subject to any conditions or restrictions placed by the
authority upon the face of the tax credit certificate and
subject to the limitations of the program.
4. Any tax credit in excess of the business’s tax liability
is refundable. In lieu of claiming a refund, the taxpayer
may elect to have the overpayment shown on the taxpayer’s
final, completed return credited to the tax liability for the
following tax year.
5. Tax credit certificates issued pursuant to this section
are not transferable.
6. If the business is a partnership, S corporation, limited
liability company, estate, or trust electing to have the income
taxed directly to the individual, an individual may claim the
tax credit allowed. The amount claimed by the individual shall
be based upon the pro rata share of the individual’s earnings
of the partnership, S corporation, limited liability company,
or estate or trust.
7. The maximum amount of tax credits the authority may issue
under this section each fiscal year shall not exceed the amount
specified in section 15.119.
8. If requests for tax credits exceed the amount available
pursuant to section 15.119, the authority shall award tax
credits based upon factors including but not limited to the
total amount of tax credits requested, the percentage of the
research and development of the business that occurs in this
state compared to research and development conducted in other
states and countries, and the economic impact of the research
and development conducted in this state.
Sec. 119. NEW SECTION. 15.525 Reporting requirements.
1. A qualified business shall report annually to the
authority all of the following:
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-53- nls/ko 53/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
a. The total amount of investment made in research and
development.
b. The location in this state where the research and
development occurred.
c. The number of jobs created, wages paid, and employee
residence locations.
2. The authority shall include as part of the annual report
under section 15.107B an annual report of the activities
conducted pursuant to this part.
3. The authority shall report all information in an
aggregate form to prevent, as much as possible, information
being attributable to any particular qualified business.
Sec. 120. NEW SECTION. 15.526 Confidentiality.
1. Except as provided in subsection 2, all information or
records in the possession of the authority with respect to this
part shall be presumed by the authority to be a trade secret
protected under chapter 550 or common law, and shall be kept
confidential by the authority unless otherwise ordered by the
court.
2. The identity of a tax credit recipient and the amount
of the tax credit shall be considered public information under
chapter 22.
Sec. 121. NEW SECTION. 422.12Q Research and development
tax credit.
The taxes imposed under this subchapter, less the credits
allowed under section 422.12, shall be reduced by a research
and development tax credit allowed pursuant to section 15.524.
Sec. 122. Section 422.33, Code 2025, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 17. The taxes imposed under this subchapter
shall be reduced by the research and development tax credit
allowed pursuant to section 15.524.
Sec. 123. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. The Code editor shall
designate sections 15.520 through 15.526, as enacted in this
division of this Act, as part 35 of subchapter II.
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-54- nls/ko 54/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Sec. 124. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being
deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment.
DIVISION XVI
SUSTAINABLE AVIATION FUEL PRODUCTION TAX CREDIT
Sec. 125. NEW SECTION. 15.530 Short title.
This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Sustainable
Aviation Fuel Production Tax Credit Program”.
Sec. 126. NEW SECTION. 15.531 Definitions.
As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. “Aviation gasoline” means the same as defined in section
452A.2.
2. “Eligible taxpayer” means a business engaged in
manufacturing sustainable aviation fuel from feedstock.
3. “Feedstock” means any organic matter processed or refined
in the state suitable for sustainable aviation fuel production
without further enhancement. “Feedstock” includes ethanol, corn
oil, soybean oil, animal fats used in cooking oil, and algae
oil.
4. “Jet fuel” means blends of hydrocarbons derived from
crude petroleum, natural gasoline, and synthetic hydrocarbons,
intended for use in aviation turbine engines, and that meet
the specifications in ASTM (American society for testing and
materials) specification D1655-12.
5. “Sustainable aviation fuel” means a liquid fuel derived
from feedstock not including palm fatty acid distillates and
that achieves at least a fifty percent life cycle greenhouse
gas emissions reduction in comparison with petroleum-based
aviation gasoline, aviation turbine fuel, and jet fuel as
determined by a test that shows any of the following:
a. The fuel production pathway achieves at least a fifty
percent life cycle greenhouse gas emissions reduction in
comparison with petroleum-based aviation gasoline, aviation
turbine fuel, and jet fuel utilizing the most recent version
of the GREET (Argonne national laboratory’s greenhouse gases,
regulated emissions, and energy use in technologies) model that
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-55- nls/ko 55/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
accounts for reduced emissions throughout the fuel production
process.
b. The fuel production pathway achieves at least a fifty
percent reduction of the aggregate attributional core life
cycle emissions and the positive induced land use change values
under the CORSIA (carbon offsetting and reduction scheme for
international aviation) life cycle methodology for sustainable
aviation fuels adopted by the international civil aviation
organization with the agreement of the United States.
Sec. 127. NEW SECTION. 15.532 Eligible business application
and agreement.
1. a. An eligible business that produces a sustainable
aviation fuel in this state from feedstock during a calendar
year may apply to the authority for the sustainable aviation
fuel tax credit provided in section 15.533.
b. The application must be made to the authority in the
manner prescribed by the authority.
c. The application must be made during the calendar year
following the calendar year in which the sustainable aviation
fuel is produced.
d. The authority may accept applications on a continuous
basis or may establish, by rule, an annual application
deadline.
e. The application must include all of the following
information:
(1) The amount of sustainable aviation fuel produced in
the state from feedstock by the eligible business during the
calendar year, measured in gallons.
(2) The types and sources of feedstock used to produce
sustainable aviation fuel, documented in sufficient detail to
allow the authority to verify that such feedstock was processed
or refined in the state.
(3) Any other information reasonably required by the
authority in order to establish and verify eligibility under
the program.
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-56- nls/ko 56/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
f. The authority shall review and score all complete
applications submitted by eligible businesses on a competitive
basis pursuant to rules adopted by the authority.
2. a. Before being issued a tax credit under section
15.533, an eligible business must enter into an agreement with
the authority for the successful completion of all requirements
of the program. As part of the agreement, the eligible
business shall agree to collect and provide any information
reasonably required by the authority in order to allow the
board to fulfill its reporting obligation under section 15.534.
b. An eligible business shall fulfill all the requirements
of the program and the agreement before the authority issues
the business a tax credit certificate or enters into a
subsequent agreement with the business under this section. The
authority may decline to enter into a subsequent agreement with
the business under this section if a prior agreement is not
successfully fulfilled.
c. Upon establishing that all requirements of the program
and the agreement have been fulfilled, the authority shall
issue a tax credit certificate to the eligible business stating
the amount of sustainable fuel tax credit the eligible business
may claim.
3. The failure in fulfilling any requirement of the program
by the eligible business or any of the terms and obligations of
an agreement entered into pursuant to this section may result
in the rescission of the tax credits issued under section
15.533, and in addition to any other penalties provided by law,
may subject the tax credits to repayment of all or a portion
of tax credit issued by the authority, and may subject the tax
credits to recapture by the authority or the department of
revenue.
4. a. Except as provided in paragraph “b”, any information
or record in the possession of the authority with respect to
the program shall be presumed by the authority to be a trade
secret protected under chapter 550 or common law and shall be
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-57- nls/ko 57/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
kept confidential by the authority unless otherwise ordered by
a court.
b. The identity of a tax credit recipient and the amount
of the tax credit shall be considered public information under
chapter 22.
Sec. 128. NEW SECTION. 15.533 Sustainable aviation fuel
tax credit.
1. An eligible business that has entered into an agreement
pursuant to section 15.532 may claim a tax credit in an amount
equal to the product of twenty-five cents multiplied by the
number of gallons of sustainable aviation fuel produced in
this state from feedstock. The sustainable aviation fuel tax
credit shall not be available for any sustainable aviation
fuel produced before the 2026 calendar year or after the 2035
calendar year.
2. The tax credit shall be allowed against taxes imposed
under chapter 422, subchapter II or III.
3. The tax credit shall be claimed for the tax year during
which the eligible business was issued the tax credit.
4. An individual may claim a tax credit under this section
of a partnership, limited liability company, S corporation,
cooperative organized under chapter 501 and filing as a
partnership for federal tax purposes, estate, or trust electing
to have income taxed directly to the individual. The amount
claimed by the individual shall be based upon the pro rata
share of the individual’s earnings from the partnership,
limited liability company, S corporation, cooperative, estate,
or trust.
5. Any tax credit in excess of the tax liability is
refundable. In lieu of claiming a refund, the taxpayer
may elect to have the overpayment shown on the taxpayer’s
final, completed return credited to the tax liability for the
following tax year.
6. a. To claim a tax credit under this section, a taxpayer
shall include one or more tax credit certificates with the
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-58- nls/ko 58/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
taxpayer’s tax return.
b. The tax credit certificate shall contain the taxpayer’s
name, address, tax identification number, the amount of the
credit, the name of the eligible business, and any other
information required by the department of revenue.
c. The tax credit certificate, unless rescinded by the
authority, shall be accepted by the department of revenue as
payment for taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 422, subchapters
II and III, subject to any conditions or restrictions placed by
the authority upon the face of the tax credit certificate and
subject to the limitations of the program.
d. Tax credit certificates issued pursuant to this section
are not transferable.
7. a. The maximum amount of tax credits the authority may
issue each fiscal year pursuant to this section shall be as
provided in section 15.119.
b. (1) The maximum amount of tax credits that the authority
may issue to an eligible business for the production of
sustainable aviation fuel in a calendar year shall not exceed
one million dollars.
(2) The authority shall not issue more than five tax credit
certificates to an eligible business for the production of
aviation fuel under the program.
Sec. 129. NEW SECTION. 15.534 Reports to general assembly.
1. For purposes of this section, “successful tax credit
applicant” includes, with respect to each calendar year, an
eligible business that was issued a tax credit certificate for
production of sustainable aviation fuel during that calendar
year.
2. The annual report under section 15.107B shall include
a report describing the activities of the program for the
previous calendar year. The report shall, at a minimum,
include all of the following information:
a. The aggregate number of gallons of sustainable aviation
fuel produced for which successful tax credit applicants
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-59- nls/ko 59/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
received a tax credit in the previous calendar year.
b. For each eligible business issued a sustainable aviation
fuel tax credit during each calendar year:
(1) The identity of the eligible business.
(2) The amount of the tax credit.
c. The total amount of all sustainable aviation fuel tax
credits claimed during each calendar year, and the portion of
the claims issued as a refund.
3. To protect the presumption of confidentiality
established, the board shall report all information in an
aggregate form to prevent, as much as possible, information
being attributable to any particular eligible business, except
as provided in subsection 2, paragraph “e”.
Sec. 130. NEW SECTION. 15.535 Future repeal.
Sections 15.530, 15.531, 15.532, 15.533, 15.534, and this
section are repealed January 1, 2037.
Sec. 131. NEW SECTION. 422.10C Sustainable aviation fuel
tax credit.
The taxes imposed under this subchapter, less the credits
allowed under section 422.12, shall be reduced by a sustainable
aviation fuel tax credit allowed under section 15.533. This
section is repealed January 1, 2037.
Sec. 132. Section 422.33, Code 2025, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 23. The taxes imposed under this subchapter
shall be reduced by a sustainable aviation fuel tax credit
allowed under section 15.533. This subsection is repealed
January 1, 2037.
Sec. 133. TAX CREDIT CLAIMS. Sustainable aviation fuel tax
credits issued pursuant to the sustainable aviation tax credit
program enacted in this division of this Act shall not be
issued by the economic development authority prior to July 1,
2026, and shall not be claimed by a taxpayer prior to September
1, 2026.
Sec. 134. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. The Code editor shall
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-60- nls/ko 60/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
designate sections 15.530 through 15.535, as enacted in this
division of this Act, as part 36 of subchapter II.
Sec. 135. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being
deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment.
Sec. 136. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This division of this
Act applies retroactively to January 1, 2025, for tax years
beginning on or after that date.
DIVISION XVII
MAJOR ECONOMIC GROWTH ATTRACTION PROGRAM
Sec. 137. Section 15.494, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
b. If the eligible business fails to comply with any
requirements of the program or the agreement as determined
by the authority, the eligible business may be required to
repay any tax incentives the authority issued to the eligible
business. A The authority shall notify the department of
revenue of any required repayment of a tax incentive shall.
Any repayment shall be considered a tax payment due and payable
to the department of revenue by any taxpayer that claimed the
tax incentive, and the failure to make the repayment may be
treated by the department of revenue in the same manner as a
failure to pay the tax shown due, or required to be shown due,
with the filing of a return or deposit form. In addition,
the county shall have the authority to take action to recover
the value of property taxes not collected as a result of the
exemption provided to the business under this part.
Sec. 138. Section 15.495, subsection 2, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
2. To receive the sales and use tax refund, the eligible
business shall file a claim with the department of revenue as
follows:
a. The contractor or subcontractor shall state under oath,
on forms provided by the department of revenue, the amount of
the sales of tangible personal property or services rendered,
furnished, or performed including water, sewer, gas, and
LSB 1186XD (12) 91
-61- nls/ko 61/74

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
electric utility services upon which sales or use tax has
been paid prior to contract completion during the period for
which the refund is claimed, and shall submit the forms to the
eligible business before contract completion.
b. The eligible business shall inform the department of
revenue in writing of contract completion. The eligible
business shall, after contract completion no more frequently
than quarterly, submit an application to the department
of revenue for a refund of the amount of the sales and use
taxes paid pursuant to chapter 423 upon any tangible personal
property, or services rendered, furnished, or performed,
including water, sewer, gas, and electric utility services.
The application shall be submitted in the form and manner
prescribed by the department of revenue. The department of
revenue shall audit the application and, if approved, issue
a warrant or warrants to the eligible business in the amount
of the sales or use tax which has been paid to the state of
Iowa under subsection 1. The eligible business’s application
must be submitted to the department of revenue within one year
after the project completion date. An application filed by the
eligible business in accordance with this section shall not be
denied by reason of a limitation set forth in chapter 421 or
423.
c. The refund shall be remitted by the department of revenue
to the eligible business equally over five tax years on a
quarterly basis. Interest shall not accrue on any part of the
refund that has not yet been remitted by the department of
revenue to the eligible business.